Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 10

Insurance Purchasing Program

12-4-1001. Alternative methods for purchasing insurance.

The state treasurer shall investigate alternative methods, including competitive bidding, for purchasing insurance for the use and benefit of the state and its agencies, departments or divisions. The state treasurer shall prepare a plan for purchasing insurance, and shall submit the plan to the board of claims prior to its implementation.

Acts 1970, ch. 567, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339,12-3-501; Acts 1994, ch. 669, § 4; 2001, ch. 89, § 1; 2013, ch. 403, § 82; T.C.A. §12-3-901.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3, part 9, §§12-3-901 —12-3-908 (Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1970, ch. 567, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339 — 12-346,12-3-501 —12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, §§ 4-7; 2001, ch. 89, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2), was transferred to title 12, ch. 4, part 10 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 82, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 9 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-4-1002. Establishment of practices and procedures for purchasing insurance.

The state treasurer shall establish accepted practices and procedures to be followed in purchasing insurance under the plan developed under §12-4-1001. Such practices and procedures shall be subject to the approval of the board of claims.

Acts 1970, ch. 567, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 12-340,12-3-502; Acts 1994, ch. 669, § 5; 2001, ch. 89, § 2; 2013, ch. 403, § 82; T.C.A. §12-3-902.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3, part 9, §§12-3-901 —12-3-908 (Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1970, ch. 567, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339 — 12-346,12-3-501 —12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, §§ 4-7; 2001, ch. 89, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2), was transferred to title 12, ch. 4, part 10 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 82, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 9 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-4-1003. State employees and agents — Insurance sales to state prohibited.

All officers, officials, agents or employees of the state and its divisions, departments and agencies are prohibited from bidding, selling or contracting to sell any policy of insurance to the state or its divisions, departments and agencies.

Acts 1970, ch. 567, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 12-341,12-3-503; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 82; T.C.A. §12-3-903.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3, part 9, §§12-3-901 —12-3-908 (Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1970, ch. 567, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339 — 12-346,12-3-501 —12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, §§ 4-7; 2001, ch. 89, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2), was transferred to title 12, ch. 4, part 10 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 82, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 9 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-4-1004. Insurance on public buildings — Amount required — Deductibles.

All buildings and building contents owned by the state shall be insured for not less than their actual cash value subject to an aggregate deductible of not less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) and to such individual claim deductible as may be commercially reasonable.

Acts 1971, ch. 425, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-342; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-504; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 82; T.C.A. §12-3-904.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3, part 9, §§12-3-901 —12-3-908 (Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1970, ch. 567, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339 — 12-346,12-3-501 —12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, §§ 4-7; 2001, ch. 89, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2), was transferred to title 12, ch. 4, part 10 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 82, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 9 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-4-1005. Insurance on public buildings — Repair or replacement costs.

The repair or replacement of damaged or destroyed buildings and building contents shall include engineering and other services necessary for such an insurance program to be paid from the risk management fund created pursuant to §9-8-109.

Acts 1971, ch. 425, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 12-343,12-3-505; Acts 2003, ch. 212, 5; 2013, ch. 403, § 82; T.C.A. §12-3-905.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3, part 9, §§12-3-901 —12-3-908 (Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1970, ch. 567, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339 — 12-346,12-3-501 —12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, §§ 4-7; 2001, ch. 89, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2), was transferred to title 12, ch. 4, part 10 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 82, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 9 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-4-1006. Establishment of policies and procedures for administration of insurance program.

The state treasurer shall establish appropriate policies and procedures governing the administration of the insurance program provided herein, including the allocation of premium and other costs and the payment of losses from the risk management fund created pursuant to §9-8-109. Such policies and procedures shall be subject to the approval of the board of claims.

Acts 1971, ch. 425, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 12-344,12-3-506; Acts 1994, ch. 669, § 6; 2001, ch. 89, § 3; 2003, ch. 212, § 6; 2013, ch. 403, § 82; T.C.A. §12-3-906.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3, part 9, §§12-3-901 —12-3-908 (Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1970, ch. 567, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339 — 12-346,12-3-501 —12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, §§ 4-7; 2001, ch. 89, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2), was transferred to title 12, ch. 4, part 10 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 82, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 9 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-4-1007. Procedure for obtaining policies — Reporting.

The policy or policies of insurance provided in this part shall be obtained by the state treasurer subject to the approval of the board of claims. Notwithstanding the Surplus Lines Insurance Act, compiled in title 56, chapter 14, or any other law to the contrary, the state treasurer, with the approval of the board of claims, shall consider proposals from admitted carriers and nonadmitted surplus lines carriers. In order for nonadmitted carriers to be eligible for consideration under this section, at least two (2) admitted carriers must have declined to submit a proposal, and the nonadmitted carriers shall:

Have a minimum A.M. Best financial strength rating of “A-” and an A.M. Best financial size category of no less than “VI”, or such other A.M. Best rating as may be established by the board of claims provided that the financial strength rating shall not be less than “A-” and the A.M. Best financial size category shall not be less than “VI”; and

Be a member of an insurance holding company system, as defined in § 56-11-101(b), that has at least one (1) affiliate carrier admitted in this state as a property or casualty insurer.

Should A.M. Best change or amend its rating methodology, then the board of claims shall adopt a minimum rating requirement that is equivalent to the rating as stated in subdivision (a)(1)(A). The state treasurer shall place the insurance directly with the companies without policies being countersigned notwithstanding § 56-2-409.

The state treasurer shall make periodic reports to the fiscal review committee of the general assembly and to the state building commission concerning the operations of the insurance program.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1971, ch. 425, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 12-346,12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, § 7; 2001, ch. 89, § 4; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2; 2013, ch. 403, § 82; T.C.A. §12-3-908.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3, part 9, §§12-3-901 —12-3-908 (Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1970, ch. 567, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1980, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-339 — 12-346,12-3-501 —12-3-508; Acts 1994, ch. 669, §§ 4-7; 2001, ch. 89, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 2), was transferred to title 12, ch. 4, part 10 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 82, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 9 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Title 56, chapter 14, part 1 referenced in (a)(1) was renumbered as title 56, chapter 14 by the authority of the code commission in 2016.